Arkansas, session 2025, SB206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-17-429(b) and (c), concerning
requirements for certain individuals to have proficient knowledge and skills
to teach reading and obtain certain professional development under the Right
to Read Act, are amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) No later than 2023, the The following shall have proficient
knowledge and skills to teach reading consistent with the best practices of
scientific reading instruction:
(i) A person who completes a state-approved educator
preparation program; and
(ii) A person seeking teacher licensure by
reciprocity or by adding an endorsement.
(B) No later than 2023, a A person who completes a state-
approved educator preparation program other than a teacher of elementary
education program shall demonstrate an awareness of the best practices of
scientific reading instruction.
*TNL105*
02/06/2025 7:44:04 AM TNL105

SB206
(2) Beginning no later than the 2022-2023 school year, each Each
state-approved educator preparation program shall post on its website
information describing its program to prepare teachers to teach reading using
scientific reading instruction aligned with but not limited to the content
measured by the stand-alone reading assessment adopted by the State Board of
Education under § 6-17-402.
(c)(1) Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, a Each public school
district and an open-enrollment public charter school shall provide the
following professional development in scientific reading instruction:
(A) For teachers licensed at the elementary level in
kindergarten through grade six (K-6), teachers with a special education
license in kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12), and teachers licensed as
reading specialists in kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12), professional
development for one (1) of the prescribed pathways to obtaining a proficiency
credential in knowledge and practices in scientific reading instruction; and
(B) For teachers licensed at a level other than the
elementary level in kindergarten through grade six (K-6), teachers with a
special education license in kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12), and
teachers licensed as reading specialists in kindergarten through grade twelve
(K-12), professional development for one (1) of the prescribed pathways to
obtaining an awareness credential in knowledge and practices in scientific
reading instruction.
(2) Beginning with the 2020-2021 school year, a Each public
school or open-enrollment public charter school that does not provide the
professional development under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall:
(A) Be placed in probationary status; and
(B) Provide notice to parents that the public school
district has not met the requirements of this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-17-429(d)(2), concerning the requirement
for teachers to demonstrate proficiency or awareness in the knowledge and
practices of scientific reading instruction under the Right to Read Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) All teachers who begin employment in the 2023-2024 school
year and each following school year shall demonstrate proficiency or
awareness in knowledge and practices of scientific reading instruction as is
02/06/2025 7:44:04 AM TNL105

SB206
applicable to their teaching position by completing the prescribed
proficiency or awareness in knowledge and practices of scientific reading
instruction credential either:
(A) As a condition of licensure; or
(B) Within one (1) year if the teacher is:
(i) Already licensed; or
(ii) Employed under a waiver from licensure.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-17-429(f)-(h), concerning resources,
curriculum programs, and professional development requirements under the
Right to Read Act, are amended to read as follows:
(f) By the beginning of the 2020-2021 school year, the The division
shall identify and create an approved list of materials, resources, and
curriculum programs for public school districts and open-enrollment public
charter schools that are supported by the science of reading and based on
instruction that is explicit, systematic, cumulative, and diagnostic,
including without limitation:
(1) Dyslexia programs that are evidence-based and:
(A) Aligned to structured literacy; or
(B) Grounded in the Orton-Gillingham methodology;
(2) Evidence-based reading intervention programs; and
(3) Evidence-based reading programs that are grounded in the
science of reading.
(g)(1) By the beginning of the 2021-2022 school year, any A public
school district and open-enrollment public charter school purchasing that
purchases a curriculum program shall choose a curriculum program from the
division's approved list of curriculum programs created under subsection (f)
of this section.
(2) A public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school that chooses to purchase a curriculum program that is not from the
division's approved list of curriculum programs shall submit the following to
the division for approval of the alternative curriculum program:
(A) A rationale for choosing the alternative curriculum
program; and
(B) Evidence-based research regarding the alternative
curriculum program.
02/06/2025 7:44:04 AM TNL105

SB206
(3) By the beginning of the 2023-2024 school year, any A public
school district or open-enrollment public charter school that is using uses a
curriculum program that is not from the division's approved list created
under subsection (f) of this section shall notify all parents, legal
guardians, and persons standing in loco parentis to students in writing and
on the public school district's or open-enrollment public charter school's
website.
(h) By the beginning of the 2019-2020 school year, a Each public
school district and an open-enrollment public charter school shall establish
a professional development program as required by § 6-15-2914(b)(1)(B) that
shall:
(1) Include without limitation instruction based on the science
of reading; and
(2) Be provided on an annual basis after the professional
development required under subdivision (c)(1) of this section is complete.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-17-429(i)(3)(B)(i), concerning
notification of a public school district's or an open-enrollment public
charter school's violation of requirements under the Right to Read Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) Beginning with the 2023-2024 school year, if If the
state board determines that a public school district or an open-enrollment
public charter school has violated subdivision (i)(3)(A) of this section, the
state board shall notify the public school district or the open-enrollment
public charter school of its violation.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-17-429(j)(2)(B), concerning the
establishment, administration, and amount of a literacy tutoring grant under
the Right to Read Act, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The literacy tutoring grant created under subdivision
(j)(2)(A) of this section shall be in the amount of five hundred dollars
($500) one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per eligible student per
year on a first-come, first-served basis, with priority given to eligible
students who are to be retained in grade three (3).

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-17-429(j)(2)(C)(vi), concerning
02/06/2025 7:44:04 AM TNL105

SB206
responsibilities of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education to
administer and implement the literacy tutoring grant under the Right to Read
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(vi) Remit payment for services provided, up to a
maximum of five hundred dollars ($500) one thousand five hundred dollars
($1,500) per eligible student per school year, which may be used for any of
the following purposes designed to improve reading or literacy skills:
(a) Online or in-person, high-dosage tutoring
services from a list of state-approved providers whose employees are trained
in the science of reading and hold:
(1) Valid teaching certificates in
either elementary education or reading; or
(2) Baccalaureate or graduate degrees in
education, English, or another subject area indicative of expertise in
reading and literacy; or
(b) Evidence-based digital literacy
applications or software programs from a list of state-approved programs that
are in alignment with the science of reading;


















02/06/2025 7:44:04 AM TNL105